src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ODDCASE
   ODDCASENOM ;
   ODDCASEOBL ;

LEXICON ODDCASENOM
 +Sg+Nom:e%>%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ODDCASEOBL
   +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
   +Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1    ;
       +Pl:             N_ODD_PL  ;
                       N_ODD_ESS ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>%^DISIMPn R         ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R         ;

LEXICON ije_ODDCASE
   ije_ODDCASENOM ;
   ije_ODDCASEOBL ;

LEXICON ije_ODDCASENOM
 +Sg+Nom:e%>%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

LEXICON ije_ODDCASEOBL
         +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm      FINAL1 ;
         +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn      FINAL1 ;
         +Sg+Ill:%>asse            FINAL1 ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
         +Sg+Ine:%>isnie           FINAL1 ;
         +Sg+Ela:%>istie           FINAL1 ;
         +Sg+Com:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
         +Pl+Nom:%>h               FINAL1 ;
         +Pl+Acc:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +Pl+Gen:%>i               FINAL1 ;
         +Pl+Ill:%>idie            FINAL1 ;
         +Pl+Ine:%>inie            FINAL1 ;
         +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie          FINAL1 ;
         +Pl+Com:%>%^DISIMPigujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:%>%^DISIMPigyjmie FINAL1 ; !

! Even syllabic stems - adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON eCASEOBL
   NIEJTESGOBL ;

! Not presently in use:
!LEXICON oeCASE
!   oeCASE_NOMSG ;
!   oeCASE_OBL   ;
!
!LEXICON oeCASE_NOMSG
! +Sg+Nom:oe FINAL1 ;
!
!LEXICON oeCASE_OBL
! +Sg: A_OE_SGILL_UML ; ! Causes Umlaut
!        A_OE           ;
!
!LEXICON A_OE_SGILL_UML
! +Ill+Uml:e%>%^2UMLse FINAL1 ; ! Causes Umlaut
!
!LEXICON A_OE
!       +Sg:      A_OE_SG  ;
!       +Pl:      A_OE_PL  ;
!                 A_OE_ESS ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:oe    R        ;
! +Cmp/SgGen:oe%>n R        ;
! +Cmp/PlGen:oe%>j R        ;
!
!LEXICON A_OE_SG
! +Acc:oe%>m  FINAL1 ;
! +Gen:oe%>n  FINAL1 ;
! +Ill:o%>se  FINAL1 ;
! +Ine:o%>sne FINAL1 ;
! +Ela:o%>ste FINAL1 ;
! +Com:o%>jne FINAL1 ;
!
!LEXICON A_OE_PL
! +Nom:oe%>h       FINAL1 ;
! +Acc:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
! +Gen:oe%>j       FINAL1 ;
! +Ill:o%>jde      FINAL1 ;
! +Ine:o%>jne      FINAL1 ;
! +Ela:o%>jste     FINAL1 ;
! +Com:oe%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
!
!LEXICON A_OE_ESS
! +Ess:o%>jne FINAL1 ;



! Comparative forms
! -----------------

LEXICON EVENCOMP
   EVENCOMPONLY ;
   EVENSUPONLY  ;

LEXICON EVENCOMPONLY
        +Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP ATTRCONT         ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP FINAL1           ; !Lene endra 18.3.16
                                         EVENCOMPCASE_OBL ;
                                         COMP-DIMIN          ;


LEXICON EVENSUPONLY
   +Der1+Der/Superl+A:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP FINAL1   ;
                                            MES      ;


LEXICON EVENCOMP_oe
          +Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP   ATTRCONT ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Use/NG:%>%^COMPDISIMP2be%^DISIMP  ATTRCONT ;
!                                                 EVENCOMPCASE_oe ;
        +Der1+Der/Superl+A:%>%^COMPDISIMPmes%^DISIMP  ATTRCONT ;
 +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Use/NG:%>%^COMPDISIMP2mes%^DISIMP ATTRCONT ;
!                                                 MES_oe          ;
                                                  COMP-DIMIN  ;


LEXICON diminODDCOMP !for å gi Der2 til Der/Comp
          diminODD_ÅBPOE ; ! Arbitrary "yes"
 +Use/NG: diminODD_ABPA  ; ! Arbitrary "no", tt.

LEXICON diminODD_ÅBPOE
                +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>åbpoe     ATTRCONT    ; ! båajoesåbpoe, *båajasåbpoe
                     +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>åbp       ÅBPOE       ;
                     +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>ommes     OMMES       ;

LEXICON diminODD_ABPA
                       +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>abpa      ATTRCONT    ; ! båajasabpa,   *båajoesabpa
                            +Der2+Der/Comp+A:%>abp       ABPA        ;
                            +Der2+Der/Superl+A:%>ammes     OMMES       ;


LEXICON ODDCOMP
          ODD_ÅBPOE ; ! Arbitrary "yes"
 +Use/NG: ODD_ABPA  ; ! Arbitrary "no", tt.

LEXICON ODD_ÅBPOE
                +Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>åbpoe     ATTRCONT    ; ! båajoesåbpoe, *båajasåbpoe
                     +Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>åbp       ÅBPOE       ;
                     +Der1+Der/Superl+A:%>ommes     OMMES       ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>obpe%»tje ATTRCONT    ;
      +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>obpe%»tj  GÅATETJEadj ;


LEXICON ODD_ABPA
                       +Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>abpa      ATTRCONT    ; ! båajasabpa,   *båajoesabpa
                            +Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>abp       ABPA        ;
                            +Der1+Der/Superl+A:%>ammes     OMMES       ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Use/NG:%>abpe%»tje ATTRCONT    ;
      +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Use/NG:%>abpa%»tj  GÅATETJEadj ;

LEXICON OMMES
   +Sg+Nom:%^DISIMP     FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Acc:e%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Gen:e%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Ill:%>asse       FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
   +Sg+Ine:%>isnie      FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Ela:%>istie      FINAL1    ;
   +Sg+Com:%>inie       FINAL1    ;
       +Pl:             N_ODD_PL  ;
                        N_ODD_ESS ;
+Cmp/SgNom:             R         ;
+Cmp/SgGen:e%>n         R         ;
+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi  R         ;
          :%^DISIMP     ATTRCONT  ;


LEXICON DIMINCOMP
          DIMIN_ÅBPOE ; ! Arbitrary "yes"
 +Use/NG: DIMIN_ABPA  ; ! Arbitrary "no", tt.

LEXICON DIMIN_ÅBPOE
            +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>åbpoe     ATTRCONT    ; ! båajoesåbpoe, *båajasåbpoe
                     +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>åbp       ÅBPOE       ;
                     +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>ommes     OMMES       ;


LEXICON DIMIN_ABPA
                       +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>abpa      ATTRCONT    ; ! båajasabpa,   *båajoesabpa
                            +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>abp       ABPA        ;
                          +Der1+Der/Superl+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:%>ammes     OMMES       ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Use/NG:%>abpe%»tje ATTRCONT    ;
      +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Use/NG:%>abpa%»tj  GÅATETJEadj ;

LEXICON s_H_EVENNOCOMP   !!= * **@CODE@**
           ATTR_S ;
           PRED_H ;




!LEXICON EVENCOMPCASE
!   EVENCOMPCASE_NOM ;
!   EVENCOMPCASE_OBL ;

!LEXICON EVENCOMPCASE_NOM
! +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP FINAL1 ;

LEXICON EVENCOMPCASE_OBL
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPm FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill:b%>asse                     FINAL1    ; !Rule to delete Jesuse%>asse > Jesusasse
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ine:b%>isnie                    FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ela:b%>istie                    FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com:b%>inie                     FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPh  FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc:b%>idie                     FINAL1    ;
  !A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMP   IGENSUFF  ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPi  FINAL1    ;
 ! A+Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen:b%<                         IGENSUFF  ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill:b%>idie                     FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ine:b%>inie                     FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ela:b%>ijstie                   FINAL1    ;
   +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com:b%>%^DISIMPigujmie          FINAL1    ;
          +Der1+Der/Comp+A:b                           N_ODD_ESS ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Cmp/SgNom:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%^DISIMP    R         ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Cmp/SgGen:%>%^COMPDISIMPbe%>%^DISIMPn R         ;
 +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Cmp/PlGen:%>%^COMPDISIMPb%>%^DISIMPi  R         ;
